Florida, session 2026, HB721.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1004.0983 Limiting the number of foreign students enrolled
in public postsecondary educational institutions.—
(1) Each Florida College System institution and state
university must limit the number of enrolled students who are
citizens of a foreign country and who are not permanent
residents of the United States to no more than 10 percent of the
total number of students enrolled at the institution or
university.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb721-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 721 2026
(2) The State Board of Education and the Board of
Governors shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to
administer this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb721-00